District of Columbia statutes.
8-1851.02

Care of classroom animals.

(a)

Animals kept in schools shall be provided sufficient food and water, be cared for in a safe and humane manner, and remain in schools during holidays only if provided adequate care.

(b)

Animals no longer needed in the classroom should be adopted out to a suitable home or given to a local humane organization for adoption.

History

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 502, 55 DCR 9186